Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3120
Petty cash funds authorized.

The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services
may request that petty cash funds be created at specific locations which may
be used for fees and costs related to the prosecution of support establishment,
modification, and enforcement cases, including, but not limited to, court
costs, filing fees, service of process fees, sheriff's costs, garnishment
and execution fees, court reporter and transcription costs, costs related
to appeals, witness and expert witness fees, and fees or costs for obtaining
necessary documents. The petty cash funds shall be created and administered
as provided in section 81-104.01, except that the amount in each petty cash
fund shall not be less than twenty-five dollars nor more than two thousand
dollars.

Laws 2007, LB296, § 11;

Laws 2011, LB265, § 1.